South Dakota, session 2026, HB1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 28-22-6 be AMENDED:
28-22-6. This chapter applies to all state funded services, including federal
funding, Medicaid and block grant fund sources, state general funds, and other funds
allocated by the Department of Social Services or the Department of Human Services,
that are provided by the following types of community-based providers:
(1) Nursing facilities;
(2) Assisted living facilities;
(3) In-home service providers;
(4) Group care providers;
(5) Psychiatric residential treatment facilities;
(6) Substance abuse disorder treatment and prevention providers;
(7) Community mental health centers;
(8) Intermediate care facilities for co-occurring intellectual and developmental
disabilities;
(9) Community support providers;
(10) Critical access hospitals as defined in § 34-12-1.1;
(11) Federally Qualified Health Centers; and
(12) Other types of providers deemed appropriate for inclusion by either the secretary
of the Department of Social Services or the secretary of the Department of Human
Services.

26.893.12 2 1250
An Act to revise the types of community-based providers for purposes of state funded
services.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1250
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1250 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1250 ENROLLED